Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Investment Commission

42.500.
State Investment Commission — Powers.

There shall be a State Investment Commission composed of:

The State Treasurer who shall be chairman;

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet;

The state controller; and

Two (2) persons appointed by the Governor.

The individuals appointed by the Governor shall be selected as follows: one (1) to be selected from a list of five (5) submitted to the Governor by the Kentucky Bankers Association, and one (1) to be selected from a list of five (5) submitted to the Governor by the Independent Community Bankers Association.

The State Investment Commission shall meet at least quarterly to review investment performance and conduct other business. This provision shall not prohibit the commission from meeting more frequently as the need arises.

The State Treasurer and secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall each have the authority to designate, by an instrument in writing over his or her signature and filed with the secretary of the commission as a public record of the commission, an alternate with full authority to:

Attend in the member’s absence, for any reason, any properly convened meeting of the commission; and

Participate in the consideration of, and vote upon, business and transactions of the commission.

Each alternate shall be a person on the staff of the appointing member or in the employ of the appointing member’s state agency or department.

Any designation of an alternate may, at the appointing member’s direction:

Be limited upon the face of the appointing instrument to be effective for only a specific meeting or specified business;

Be shown on the face of the appointing instrument to be a continuing designation, for a period of no more than four (4) years, whenever the appointing member is unable to attend; or

Be revoked at any time by the appointing member in an instrument in writing, over his or her signature, filed with the secretary of the commission as a public record of the commission.

Any person transacting business with, or materially affected by, the business of the commission may accept and rely upon a joint certificate of the secretary of the commission and any member of the commission concerning the designation of any alternate, the time and scope of the designation, and, if it is of a continuing nature, whether and when the designation has been revoked. The joint certificate shall be made and delivered to the person requesting it within a reasonable time after it has been requested in writing, with acceptable identification of the business or transaction to which it refers and the requesting person’s interest in the business or transaction.

Any three (3) persons who are members of the commission or alternates authorized under subsections (4) and (5) of this section shall constitute a quorum and may, by majority vote, transact any business of the commission. Any three (3) members of the commission may call a meeting.

The provisions of KRS

61.070

shall not apply to members of the commission.

The commission shall have authority and may, if in its opinion the cash in the State Treasury is in excess of the amount required to meet current expenditures, invest any and all of the excess cash in:

Obligations and contracts for future delivery of obligations backed by the full faith and credit of the United States or a United States government agency, including but not limited to:

United States Treasury;

Export-Import Bank of the United States;

Farmers Home Administration;

Government National Mortgage Corporation; and

Merchant Marine bonds;

Obligations of any corporation of the United States government or government-sponsored enterprise, including but not limited to:

Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation;

Federal Farm Credit Banks:

Bank for Cooperatives;

Federal Intermediate Credit Banks; and

Federal Land Banks;

Federal Home Loan Banks;

Federal National Mortgage Association; and

Tennessee Valley Authority obligations;

Collateralized or uncollateralized certificates of deposit, issued by banks rated in one (1) of the three (3) highest categories by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization or other interest-bearing accounts in depository institutions chartered by this state or by the United States, except for shares in mutual savings banks;

Bankers acceptances for banks rated in the highest short-term category by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization;

Commercial paper rated in the highest short-term category by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization;

Securities issued by a state or local government, or any instrumentality or agency thereof, in the United States, and rated in one (1) of the three (3) highest long-term categories by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization;

United States denominated corporate, Yankee, and Eurodollar securities, excluding corporate stocks, issued by foreign and domestic issuers, including sovereign and supranational governments, rated in one (1) of the three (3) highest long-term categories by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization;

Asset-backed securities rated in the highest category by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization;

Shares of mutual funds, each of which shall have the following characteristics:

The mutual fund shall be an open-end diversified investment company registered under Federal Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended;

The management company of the investment company shall have been in operation for at least five (5) years;

The mutual fund shall be rated in the highest category by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization;

All of the securities in the mutual fund shall be eligible investments pursuant to this section; and

State and local delinquent property tax claims which upon purchase shall become certificates of delinquency secured by interests in real property not to exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in the aggregate. For any certificates of delinquency that have been exonerated pursuant to KRS 132.220(5), the Department of Revenue shall offset the loss suffered by the Finance and Administration Cabinet against subsequent local distributions to the affected taxing districts as shown on the certificate of delinquency.

The State Investment Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations for the investment and reinvestment of state funds in shares of mutual funds, and the regulations shall specify:

The long and short term goals of any investment;

The specification of moneys to be invested;

The amount of funds which may be invested per instrument;

The qualifications of instruments; and

The acceptable maturity of investments.

Any investment in obligations and securities pursuant to subsection (9) of this section shall satisfy this section if these obligations are subject to repurchase agreements, provided that delivery of these obligations is taken either directly or through an authorized custodian.

Income earned from investments made pursuant to this section shall accrue to the credit of the investment income account of the general fund, except that interest from investments of excess cash in the road fund shall be credited to the surplus account of the road fund and interest from investments of excess cash in the game and fish fund shall be credited to the game and fish fund, interest earned from investments of imprest cash funds and funds in the trust and revolving fund for each state public university shall be credited to the appropriate institutional account, and interest earned from the investment of funds accumulated solely by means of contributions and gifts shall not be diverted to any purpose other than that stipulated by the donor, when the donor shall have designated the use to which the interest shall be placed.

Except as otherwise provided by law, or by the obligations and covenants contained in resolutions and trust indentures adopted or entered into for state bond issues, interest earned from the investment of moneys appropriated to the capital construction accounts, trust and agency accounts, and trust and agency revolving accounts shall accrue to the capital construction investment income account.

If there is a revenue shortfall, as defined in KRS

48.010

, of five percent (5%) or less, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon the recommendation of the state budget director, may direct the transfer of excess unappropriated capital construction investment income to the general fund investment income account. The amount of the transfer shall not exceed the amount of the shortfall in general fund revenues.

If the capital construction investment income is less than that amount appropriated by the General Assembly, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may, upon recommendation of the state budget director, direct the transfer of excess unappropriated general fund investment income to the capital construction investment income account. The transfer of general fund investment income revenues to the capital construction investment income account shall be made only when the actual general fund revenues are in excess of the enacted estimates under KRS

48.120

and shall be limited to the amount of the excess general fund revenues. The amount of the transfer shall not exceed the amount of the shortfall in the capital construction fund revenues.

The authority granted by this section to the State Investment Commission shall not extend to any funds that are specifically provided by law to be invested by some other officer or agency of the state government.

The authority granted by this section to the State Investment Commission shall only be exercised pursuant to the administrative regulations mandated by KRS

42.525

.

Each member of the State Investment Commission shall post bond for his or her acts or omissions as a member thereof identical in amount and kind to that posted by the State Treasurer.

History.

Repealed, reenacted and amended Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 6, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 300, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 450, § 58, effective July 1, 1983; 1984, ch. 324, § 60, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 408, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 368, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 277, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 291, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 294, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 101, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 36, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 209, § 19, effective March 30, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 54, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 78, § 28, effective June 25, 2009; 2013, ch. 60, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2021 ch. 159, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

42.505.
Authority of State Investment Commission.

Subject to the limitations of KRS Chapters 41 and 42 the State Investment Commission is authorized to make purchases, sales, exchanges, investments, and reinvestments, of any of the securities and investments in which any of the state funds shall have been invested, as well as the proceeds of said investments and any money belonging to said funds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 7, effective July 15, 1982.

42.510.
Fixing rates of interest — Relationship to Linked Deposit Investment Program. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 276, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 208, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; repealed by 2019 ch. 125, § 5, effective June 27, 2019.

42.515.
Investments to be offered first to Kentucky depositories. [Repealed.]

42.520.
Priority for assignment of public funds.

The State Investment Commission shall assign public funds to public depositories by priority based on evidence that the public depository serves the convenience and economic development needs of the communities in which they are chartered to do business. The convenience and needs of communities shall include the need for credit services as well as deposit services.

The State Investment Commission shall only assign priorities to public depositories on the basis of compliance with regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 10, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 276, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 208, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.

42.525.
Authority to promulgate administrative regulations.

The State Investment Commission shall promulgate administrative regulations for the investment and reinvestment of state funds and the acquisition, retention, management, and disposition of investments.

The regulations shall specify:

The long and short term goals of any investment;

The specification of moneys to be invested;

The amount of funds which may be invested per instrument;

The qualifications of instruments;

The acceptable maturity of investments;

The investment procedure with respect to in-state and out-of-state depositories provided that funds available for investment shall be offered first to qualified Kentucky depositories consistent with the investment guidelines; and

The distribution method of funds among types of institutions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 11, effective July 15, 1982; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 37, effective May 30, 1997.

42.530.
Quarterly reports of commission.

The State Investment Commission shall render quarterly written reports concerning the performance of each investment to the Legislative Research Commission. The reports may contain recommendations of the commission for legislative or other action to effectuate the purposes and policies of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 12, effective July 15, 1982.

42.535.
Annual reports of agencies holding funds.

Each agency holding funds listed in this section shall make a report according to generally accepted accounting principles of all money received and disbursed by the listed funds during each fiscal year, on or before the fifteenth of July, showing the receipts, expenditures, depositories, rates of interest paid by depositories, investments, and rates of return on investments by each listed fund to the Office of the Controller. The funds which shall be reported are:

Tobacco research trust fund;

The uninsured employers’ fund;

The administrative fund created by KRS

342.440

, also known as the workers’ compensation maintenance fund;

The special claim fund; and

The common school fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 13, effective July 15, 1982; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 38, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 85, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(5/30/97). KRS

342.440

, cited in this statute, was repealed by 1987 (1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 1, sec. 72(2), effective January 4, 1988.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section and KRS

42.550

suggest that the Legislature fully expects the Council for Education Technology, in its advisory capacity to the State Board, to invest the education technology funds, as opposed to the State Investment Commission.

OAG 91-39

.

42.540.
Annual reports of nonprofit fiduciary holding funds for benefit of state organization.

Notwithstanding KRS

41.290

, every nonprofit fiduciary holding funds for the benefit of any form of state organization, including, but not limited to, Eastern Kentucky University, Kentucky State University, Morehead State University, Murray State University, Northern Kentucky University, University of Kentucky, University of Louisville, Western Kentucky University, Kentucky Community and Technical College System, and the State Fair Board shall make a report according to generally accepted accounting principles of all money received and disbursed during each fiscal year, on or before the fifteenth of July, showing receipts, expenditures, depositories, rates of interest paid by depositories, investments, and rates of return in investments to the Office of the Controller. These fiduciaries include, but are not limited to, Eastern Kentucky University Foundation; Kentucky State University Foundation, Inc.; Morehead State University Foundation, Inc.; Morehead Alumni Foundation, Inc.; Eagle Athletic Foundation, Inc.; Murray State University Foundation; Northern Kentucky University Foundation, Inc.; University of Kentucky Research Foundation; University of Kentucky Athletics Association; the Fund for the Advancement of Education and Research in the University of Kentucky Medical Center; Health Care Collection Service, Inc.; McDowell Cancer Network, Inc.; University of Kentucky-Business Partnership Foundation, Inc.; Kentucky Medical Services Foundation, Inc.; University of Louisville Foundation, Inc.; University of Louisville Hospital, Inc.; University of Louisville Institute of Industrial Research, Inc.; University of Louisville Medical School Fund, Inc.; the College Heights Foundation; KFEC Research and Development Foundation, Inc.; Kentucky Export Resources Authority, Inc.; and all similar nonprofit fiduciaries for the benefit of any form of state organization and their successors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 14, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 325, § 22, effective July 13, 1990; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 32, effective May 30, 1997; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 39, effective May 30, 1997.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/28/97). This section was amended by 1997 (1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 1, sec. 32, and ch. 4, sec. 39, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together under KRS 7.136(3).

42.545.
Annual report of each agency authorized to issue bonds.

Each agency authorized to issue bonds listed in this section shall make a report according to generally accepted accounting principles of all money received and disbursed during each fiscal year, on or before the fifteenth of July, showing the receipts, expenditures, trustees, depositories, rates of interest paid by depositories, investments, and rates of return on investments by each agency to the Office of the Controller. The agencies required to report under this section are Eastern Kentucky University; Kentucky State University; Morehead State University; Murray State University; Northern Kentucky University; University of Kentucky; University of Louisville; Western Kentucky University; Kentucky Community and Technical College System; Kentucky Housing Corporation; Kentucky Higher Education Student Loan Corporation; Kentucky School Building Authority; the Turnpike Authority of Kentucky; the State Property and Buildings Commission; Churchill Downs Authority; State Fair Board; Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources; Water Resources Authority of Kentucky; and any other agency or instrumentality authorized to issue bonds.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 15, effective July 15, 1982; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 33, effective May 30, 1997; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 40, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 83, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 55, effective June 20, 2005; 2020 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

42.550.
Annual reports of school funds from Department of Education.

The Department of Education shall make a report according to generally accepted accounting principles of all money received and disbursed from the common school fund and the Support Education Excellence in Kentucky (SEEK) Program to local school districts showing their receipts, expenditures, depositories, rates of interest paid by depositories, investments, and rates of return on investments by each fund to the Office of the Controller for each fiscal year on or before the fifteenth of July.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 20, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 476, Pt. IV, § 117, effective July 13, 1990; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 41, effective May 30, 1997.

Opinions of Attorney General.

KRS

42.535

and this section suggest that the Legislature fully expects the Council for Education Technology, in its advisory capacity to the State Board, to invest the education technology funds, as opposed to the State Investment Commission.

OAG 91-39

.

42.555.
Investment commission as Sinking Fund Commission — Sale of stock in Bank of Kentucky.

For the purposes of Section 185 of the Constitution of Kentucky, the State Investment Commission shall constitute the Sinking Fund Commission.

The State Investment Commission may sell the stock in the Bank of Kentucky referred to in Sections 184 and 185 of the Constitution of Kentucky. The State Investment Commission may sell and reinvest the proceeds of the sale of the stock in the Bank of Kentucky from time to time.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 382, § 21, effective July 15, 1982.